Illinois, session 104th, SB1609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 19.12 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/19.12 new)7    Sec. 19.12. Continuing appropriation to address emerging 8drinking water contaminants. For the purpose of ensuring that 9there is appropriated to the Agency on an annual basis the 10funding necessary to address the risk to public health and 11safety caused by emerging drinking water contaminants that 12have the potential to threaten drinking water supplies in the 13State, there is hereby appropriated, on a continuing annual 14basis in each fiscal year, from the General Revenue Fund to the 15Agency, the amount, if any, by which the total appropriation 16to the Agency from the General Revenue Fund for that fiscal 17year for that express purpose is less than $5,000,000.